Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4737
Hearing loss; tracking system.

The Legislature recognizes that it is necessary to track newborns and infants identified with a potential hearing loss or who have been evaluated and have been found to have a hearing loss for a period of time in order to render appropriate followup care. The Department of Health and Human Services shall determine and implement the most appropriate system for this state which is available to track newborns and infants identified with a hearing loss. It is the intent of the Legislature that the tracking system provide the department and Legislature with the information necessary to effectively plan and establish a comprehensive system of developmentally appropriate services for newborns and infants who have a potential hearing loss or who have been found to have a hearing loss and shall reduce the likelihood of associated disabling conditions for such newborns and infants.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 591.